Florida, session 2026, HB161.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 381.995, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.995 Perimenopause and menopause workgroup and
information.—
(1)(a) The Department of Health shall establish a
perimenopause and menopause policy workgroup. The workgroup
shall:
1. Develop key messages relating to perimenopause and
menopause.
2. Set initiative priorities.
3. Ensure, in conjunction with diversity and health equity
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb161-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 161 2026
stakeholders, that initiatives are representative of diverse
communities of women and that the messaging resonates, is
culturally appropriate, and is delivered by trusted messengers.
4. Create a coordinated communications strategy to focus
on multiple audiences and use a variety of communications tools
to reach:
a. Women and men of all ages.
b. Employers.
c. Medical providers.
5. Consider dissemination points for information
including, but not limited to, personal trainers, yoga
instructors, hairdressers, religious meeting places, and
community centers.
6. Support efforts to communicate science on safety of
hormone replacement therapy (HRT) and nonhormonal therapies in
appropriate patients, and their use in improving health for
menopausal women.
(b) The workgroup shall be composed of health care
providers, women who have experienced perimenopause or
menopause, advocates, and other interested parties and
associations.
(2) The Department of Health, in collaboration with the
workgroup, the Office of Women's Health, and relevant state
agencies, shall develop and make publicly available, by posting
on its Internet website, resources and an Internet website link
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb161-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 161 2026
to materials relating to perimenopause and menopause. The
resources shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the
following:
(a) Accurate scientific information on perimenopausal and
menopausal symptoms and treatment options.
(b) Information on health risks associated with reduced
estrogen production and what women should do to stay healthy.
(c) A downloadable checklist that can be printed and taken
to a clinician visit that details preventive care women need as
they reach and move through midlife and provide a set of
questions women may wish to ask their clinician.
(d) Content adapted from existing clinician-directed
menopause materials, other federal Offices of Women's Health,
and tools created by patient education and advocacy
organizations.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb161-00